South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Definition SECTION 1.    Section 63-1-40(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6) "Status offense" means any offense which would not be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, such as, but not limited to, incorrigibility (beyond the control of parents), truancy, running away, playing or loitering in a billiard room, or gaining admission to a theater by false identification. Definition SECTION 2.    Section 63-19-20(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Status offense" means an offense which would not be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult including, but not limited to, incorrigibility or beyond the control of parents, truancy, running away, playing or loitering in a billiard room, or gaining admission to a theater by false identification. Repeal SECTION 3.    Section 63-19-2430 of the S.C. Code is repealed. Time effective SECTION 4.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________